District of Columbia statutes.
9-1103.02

Congressional consent given to effectuate amendments to Compact.

The consent of Congress is hereby given to the State of Maryland and the Commonwealth of Virginia to effectuate the following amendments to the Compact, and the Mayor of the District of Columbia is authorized and directed to effectuate said amendments on behalf of the United States for the District of Columbia.

Article I

There is hereby created the Washington Metropolitan Area Transit District, hereinafter referred to as Metropolitan District, which shall embrace the District of Columbia, the cities of Alexandria and Falls Church, the counties of Arlington and Fairfax, and political subdivisions of the State of Virginia located within those counties and that portion of Loudoun County, Virginia, occupied by the Dulles International Airport and the counties of Montgomery and Prince Georges, in the State of Maryland and political subdivisions of the State of Maryland located within said counties, and all other cities now or hereafter existing in Maryland or Virginia within the geographic area bounded by the other boundaries of the combined area of said counties, cities and airport.

Article XII

Transportation Covered

1.

(a)

This subchapter shall apply to the transportation for hire by any carrier of persons between any points in the Metropolitan District and to the persons engaged in rendering or performing such transportation service, except —

(1)

transportation by water;

(2)

transportation by the Federal Government, the signatories hereto, or any political subdivision thereof;

(3)

transportation by motor vehicles employed solely in transporting school children and teachers to or from public or private schools;

(4)

transportation performed in the course of an operation over a regular route, between a point in the Metropolitan District and a point outside the Metropolitan District, including transportation between points on such regular route within the Metropolitan District as to interstate and foreign commerce, if authorized by certificate of public convenience and necessity or permit issued by the Interstate Commerce Commission, and any carrier whose only transportation within the Metropolitan District is within this exemption shall not be deemed to be a carrier subject to the Compact; provided, however, if the primary function of a carrier’s entire operations is the furnishing of mass transportation service within the Washington Metropolitan Area Transit District, then such operations in the Metropolitan District shall be subject to the jurisdiction of the Commission;

(5)

transportation performed by a common carrier by railroad subject to Part I of the Interstate Commerce Act, as amended.

(b)

The provisions of this Title II shall not apply to transportation as specified in this section solely within the Commonwealth of Virginia and to the activities of persons engaged in such transportation, nor shall any provision of this Title II be construed to infringe the exercise of any power or the discharge of any duties conferred or imposed upon the State Corporation Commission of the Commonwealth of Virginia by the Virginia Constitution.

(c)

Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraph (a) of this section, this Act shall apply to taxicabs and other vehicles used in performing a bona fide taxicab service having a seating capacity of eight passengers or less in addition to the driver thereof with respect only to (i) the rate or charges for transportation from one signatory to another within the confines of the Metropolitan District, and (ii) requirements for minimum insurance coverage.

Annual Report of the Commission

24.

The Commission shall make an annual report for each fiscal year ending June thirtieth, to the Governor of Virginia and the Governor of Maryland, and to the Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia as soon as practicable after June thirtieth, but no later than the 1st day of January of each year, which shall contain, in addition to a report of the work performed under this subchapter, such other information and recommendations concerning passenger transportation within the Metropolitan District, as the Commission deems advisable.

History

Oct. 9, 1962, 76 Stat. 765, Pub. L. 87-767, § 1

Section References

This section is referenced in § 9-1107.01.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-2412.
1973 Ed., § 1-1410a.

Change in Government

This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 401 of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to a single Commissioner. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.